Vermont, session 2025-2026, H286.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION;
DRINKING WATER STANDARDS; PERFLUOROALKYL AND
POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES
(a) As used in this section, “perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances”
or “PFAS” means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least
one fully fluorinated carbon atom.
(b) On or before July 1, 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall file
under 3 V.S.A. § 841 a final proposed rule with the Secretary of State and the
Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules establishing the following
under the Department of Environmental Conservation’s Water Supply Rule:
(1) a maximum contaminant level (MCL) of zero parts per trillion for
the PFAS of perfluorooctanoic acid, perfluorooctane sulfonic acid,
perfluorohexane sulfonic acid, perfluorononanoic acid, perfluoroheptanoic
acid, and perfluorodecanoic acid; and
(2) an MCL of not more than 20 parts per trillion total for any testable
PFAS combined other than those PFAS listed under subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379373 v.1